Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 436 Offenses Against Morality

436.010.
Seduction of female under twenty-one. [Repealed.]

436.020.
Abortion or miscarriage. [Repealed.]

436.023.
Waiting period required between consent to and performance of abortion. [Repealed.]

436.026.
Sale or transfer of viable aborted child for use in experimentation prohibited.

Any person who shall sell, transfer, distribute, or give away any live or viable aborted child or permits such child to be used for any form of experimentation shall be guilty of a Class B felony. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as prohibiting adoption or foster care proceedings pursuant to the provisions of the laws of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 255, § 13; 1992, ch. 463, § 61, effective July 14, 1992.

436.030.
Concealing birth of bastard. [Repealed.]

436.040.
Pandering. [Repealed.]

436.050.
Sodomy — Buggery. [Repealed.]

436.060.
Incest. [Repealed.]

436.070.
Fornication — Adultery. [Repealed.]

436.075.
Prostitution, lewdness and assignation. [Repealed.]

436.080.
Bigamy. [Repealed.]

436.090.
Manufacture, distribution or advertising of articles for immoral use. [Repealed.]

436.100.
Distribution of obscene literature. [Repealed.]

436.101.
Obscene matter, distribution, penalties, destruction. [Repealed.]

436.107.
Use of obscene language or proposals on telephone — Notice of law on telephone books. [Repealed.]

436.110.
Publications featuring crime. [Repealed.]

436.120.
Exceptions to KRS 436.090 and 436.110. [Repealed.]

436.130.
Publications featuring pictures of people influenced by stimulants. [Repealed.]

436.140.
Appearing on highway in bathing garb. [Repealed.]

436.150.
Profane cursing or swearing. [Repealed.]

436.155.
Scalping of sports tickets. [Repealed.]

436.160.
Working on Sunday — Work of necessity or charity, athletic games and certain businesses and employers excluded — Penalty.

Any person who works on Sunday at his own or at any other occupation or employs any other person, in labor or other business, whether for profit or amusement, unless his work or the employment of others is in the course of ordinary household duties, work of necessity or charity or work required in the maintenance or operation of a public service or public utility plant or system, shall be fined not less than two dollars ($2) nor more than fifty dollars ($50). The employment of every person employed in violation of this subsection shall be deemed a separate offense.

Persons who are members of a religious society which observes as a Sabbath any other day in the week than Sunday shall not be liable to the penalty prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, if they observe as a Sabbath one (1) day in each seven (7).

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to amateur sports, athletic games, or operation of grocery stores whose principal business is the sale of groceries and related food items, drug stores whose principal business is the sale of drugs and related drug items, gift shops, souvenir shops, fishing tackle shops and bait shops, moving picture shows, chautauquas, filling stations, or opera.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to employers using continuous work scheduling provided that such scheduling permits at least one (1) day of rest each calendar week for each employee.

History.

1290a-7, 1290a-11, 1321, 1323, 1369, 1979: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 18, § 1; 1978, ch. 250, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

436.165.
Retail sales and activities on Sunday subject to control of legislative body of city or county — Restrictions — Public vote.

In addition to the provisions of KRS

436.160

:

The legislative body of any city, except as to activities permitted under KRS

436.160

, shall have the exclusive power to enact ordinances or orders permitting and regulating other retail sales and activities on Sunday within its jurisdictional boundaries, subject to subsection (4) hereof.

The fiscal court of each county, except as to activities permitted under KRS

436.160

, shall have exclusive power to enact resolutions or orders permitting and regulating other retail sales and activities on Sunday in that portion of the county which lies outside of the corporate limits of any cities within said county, subject to subsection (4) hereof.

In any city, county, or urban-county government where the legislative body has failed to enact ordinances permitting retail sales and activities on Sunday, the matter may be put to a vote of the people. Upon a petition signed by eligible voters in a number equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the voters who voted in the last general election, a proposition to permit retail sales and activities on Sunday shall be placed before the voters at the next general election. Any such petition shall be submitted to the county clerk of that county for verification of the signatures. The petition shall be submitted to the county clerk and certified by the county clerk as sufficient not later than the second Tuesday in August prior to a general election to be eligible for placement of the question before the voters.

Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, any ordinance, resolution or order adopted by the legislative body of any city or the fiscal court of any county pertaining to retail sales and activities on Sunday shall be subject to the following limitations:

No employer shall require as a condition of employment that any employee work on Sunday or on any other day of the week which any such employee may conscientiously wish to observe as a religious Sabbath.

No employer shall in any way discriminate in the hiring or retaining of employees between those who designate a Sabbath as their day of rest and those who do not make such designation, provided, however, that the payment of premium or overtime wage rates for Sunday employment shall not be deemed discriminatory.

No person permitted, under the provisions of this section, to engage in a retail business on Sunday shall be open to the public between the hours of 6 a.m. and noon on any Sunday.

Every employer engaged in retail sales on Sunday shall allow each person employed by him in connection with such business or service at least twenty-four (24) consecutive hours of rest in each calendar week in addition to the regular periods of rest normally allowed or legally required in each working day.

No business shall be required to be open on Sunday as part of a lease agreement, franchise agreement or any other contractual arrangement. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any lease agreement, franchise agreement or any other contractual arrangement entered into before July 15, 1980.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 18, § 2; 1980, ch. 142, § 1, effective January 1, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 85, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 195, § 70, effective July 15, 1996.

436.170.
Exhibiting or using studhorse, jack or bull near place of worship, residence or school. [Repealed.]

436.180.
Cruelty to animals. [Repealed.]

436.185.
Exhibition of walking horse where the horse’s front legs or hoofs show evidence of burns, drugs, lacerations or any pain inflicting device.

The term “walking horse” as used in this section shall be construed to include only that breed of horses known as walking horses.

The term “handler” as used in this section shall be construed to mean that person or persons who are in charge of grooming, preparing and readying said horse for competition.

No walking horse shall be permitted to compete or exhibit in any exhibition or fair either for profit or pleasure, if said horse’s front legs or hoofs show evidence of burns, drugs, lacerations, any sharp pointed instrument, or any pain inflicting device.

It shall be the duty of the assigned ringmaster in charge of any such exhibition or competition to properly inspect the front legs and hoofs of each entry in each class or event. Said inspection shall be for the purpose of determining whether there is any evidence of burns, drugs, lacerations, any sharp pointed instrument, or any pain inflicting device appearing on said animal.

If any such evidence appears to the satisfaction of the ringmaster, he shall immediately bar said horse from competition, and notify the sheriff of said county of said violation. The handler of said horse shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned for ten (10) days or both. For the second and each subsequent offense he shall be imprisoned for thirty (30) days.

Any ringmaster who fails to perform these duties, and permits the commission of any of the offenses stated in subsection (2), shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense allowed.

This section shall in no wise repeal any laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky on the subject of cruelty to animals and shall be construed by the courts as supplementary thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 245, §§ 1 to 6, effective May 18, 1956.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cruelty to animals, KRS

525.125

,

525.130

.

436.190.
Dog fights and chicken fights. [Repealed.]

436.200.
Gambling in general. [Repealed.]

436.210.
Common gambler. [Repealed.]

436.220.
Gambler may be required to give surety for good behavior. [Repealed.]

436.230.
Operating gambling machine, game or contrivance — Pools at race tracks and pinball machines exempted. [Repealed.]

436.240.
Permitting operation of gambling device on premises. [Repealed.]

436.250.
Permitting gambling on premises. [Repealed.]

436.260.
Persuading another to visit gambling place — Liability to him and his creditors. [Repealed.]

436.270.
Playing at gambling device. [Repealed.]

436.280.
Gambling implements to be seized and destroyed. [Repealed.]

436.290.
Search for gambling tables. [Repealed.]

436.300.
Betting on billiards or pool. [Repealed.]

436.310.
Permitting betting on billiards or pool. [Repealed.]

436.320.
Minor to furnish identification to play billiards or pool — Owner of table to supply blank cards.

No person owning or controlling a billiard or pool table shall permit, for compensation or reward, any minor under eighteen (18) years of age to play any game on the table, unless such minor shall have first displayed an identification card containing his name, age, photograph, and the signature of his parents or guardian. The minor shall keep such identification card on his person, and it shall be subject to inspection at any time by any peace officer. The person owning or controlling such billiard or pool table shall keep and maintain a registration book in which each minor shall sign. The person owning or controlling such billiard or pool table shall supply a blank identification card to each parent or guardian who makes request for same. Any person who violates this section shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

1972: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 71, § 1; 1954, ch. 232, § 1, effective June 17, 1954.

436.330.
Betting on election. [Repealed.]

436.340.
Limitation of actions under KRS 436.200 to 436.330. [Repealed.]

436.350.
Peace officer to arrest person operating gambling machine, game or contrivance. [Repealed.]

436.360.
Lotteries and gift enterprises — “Chain” merchandising — Injunctive relief — Civil penalties. [Repealed.]

436.370.
Permitting premises to be used for lottery or gift enterprise. [Repealed.]

436.380.
Procuring lottery ticket. [Repealed.]

436.390.
Prohibition of fictitious lotteries. [Repealed.]

436.400.
Buyer of lottery ticket may testify against seller. [Repealed.]

436.410.
Indictment in lottery cases. [Repealed.]

436.420.
Advertising lotteries in newspapers and magazines. [Repealed.]

436.430.
Selling paper containing lottery advertisement. [Repealed.]

436.440.
Keeping or leasing premises where bets are placed on races or other contests. [Repealed.]

436.450.
Acting as agent or employe of another in keeping premises where bets are placed on races or other contests. [Repealed.]

436.460.
Assembling on premises where bets are placed on races or other contests. [Repealed.]

436.470.
Peace officer to suppress places where bets are placed on races or other contests. [Repealed.]

436.480.
Pari-mutuel wagering exempt from KRS Ch. 528.

KRS Chapter 528 shall not apply to pari-mutuel wagering authorized under the provisions of KRS Chapter 230.

History.

3914b-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 327; 1976, ch. 183, § 7.

436.490.
Betting on or transmitting bets on horse races other than authorized Kentucky races. [Repealed.]

436.500.
Betting on boxing or wrestling match. [Repealed.]

436.505.
Bribing or attempting to bribe participants in professional or amateur sports events. [Repealed.]

436.506.
Participant in sports event soliciting or accepting bribe. [Repealed.]

436.510.
Witnesses in investigation or prosecution for gambling.

In any prosecution or any investigation by an examining court or grand jury of gambling violations, it shall be no exemption for a witness that his testimony may incriminate himself.

It shall be no exemption for the buyer of a lottery ticket, in any prosecution against the seller of a lottery ticket, that his testimony may incriminate himself.

No testimony given in the proceedings stated in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be used against the testifying witness in any prosecution except for false swearing.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a witness testifying in any prosecution against the seller of a lottery ticket, shall be discharged from all liability for any offense necessarily disclosed in his testimony.

A witness testifying in any prosecution for gambling shall be discharged from all liability for gambling disclosed in his testimony.

No person against whom a witness testifies in any prosecution for gambling shall testify as to any gambling by the witness.

History.

1328a, 1973, 2579: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 334.

436.520.
Vagrancy. [Repealed.]

436.530.
Peace officers to disperse vagrants. [Repealed.]

436.540.
Legislative policy as to comic books declared. [Repealed.]

436.550.
Publication and distribution of comic books devoted to accounts of methods of crime, terror, brutality or illicit sex. [Repealed.]

436.560.
Selling, lending, showing, advertising for sale or distribution to persons under the age of eighteen years of comic books described under KRS 436.550 — Presumptive evidence. [Repealed.]

436.570.
Actions to enjoin the publication, distribution or sale of articles prohibited by KRS 436.540 to 436.560. [Repealed.]

436.575.
Motion picture rating required to be included in any motion picture advertising placed or accepted.

No person shall advertise any motion picture in any media, including but not limited to newspapers, magazines, radio, television, or billboards, without including the rating assigned to that picture by the Motion Picture Coding Association of America or its successor, if a rating has been assigned to the said motion picture.

No person shall accept for publication or publish or air any motion picture advertisement which does not carry a rating as assigned by the Motion Picture Coding Association of America, unless such motion picture has not been rated by the said association or its successor.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than $50 nor more than $500.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 351, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Advertising obscene material, KRS

531.050

.

436.580.
Tie-in sales of publications which may not lawfully be sold. [Repealed.]

436.590.
Definitions in KRS 436.180 and 436.590 to 436.600. [Repealed.]

436.593.
Injuring, poisoning or killing domestic animals. [Repealed.]

436.595.
Stealing domestic animal — Possession of stolen animal. [Repealed.]

436.597.
Abandonment of dog or cat. [Repealed.]

436.600.
Dyeing or selling dyed baby fowl or rabbits.

No person shall sell, exchange, offer to sell or exchange, display, or possess living baby chicks, ducklings, or other fowl or rabbits which have been dyed or colored; nor dye or color any baby chicks, ducklings, or other fowl or rabbits; nor sell, exchange, offer to sell or exchange or to give away baby chicks, ducklings, or other fowl or rabbits, under two (2) months of age in any quantity less than six (6), except that any rabbit weighing three (3) pounds or more may be sold at an age of six (6) weeks. Any person who violates this section shall be fined not less than $100 nor more than $500.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 215, § 5; 1972, ch. 374, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Cruelty to animals, KRS

525.125

,

525.130

.

436.605.
Animal control officers and humane agents have powers of peace officers, except power of arrest — Search warrants — Execution of search warrants — Arrest by peace officer.

Animal control officers and officers and agents of humane societies who are employed by, appointed by, or have contracted with a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to provide animal sheltering or animal control services shall have the powers of peace officers, except for the power of arrest, for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, provided they possess the qualifications required under KRS

61.300

.

When any peace officer, animal control officer, or any officer or agent of any society or association for the prevention of cruelty to animals duly incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth who is employed by, appointed by, or has contracted with a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government to provide animal sheltering or animal control services makes an oath before any judge of a District Court that he has reasons to believe or does believe that an act of cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals is being committed in a building, barn, or other enclosure, the judge shall issue a search warrant directed to the peace officer, animal control officer, or officer or agent of the society or association for the prevention of cruelty to animals to search the premises. If a peace officer finds that an act of cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals is being perpetrated, the offender or offenders shall be immediately arrested by the peace officer and brought before the court for trial. If an animal control officer or an officer or agent of a society or association for the prevention of cruelty to animals finds that an act of cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals is being perpetrated, the officer or agent shall summon a peace officer to arrest the offender or offenders and bring them before the court for trial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 215, §§ 4, 7; 1974, ch. 406, § 328; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 444, effective January 1, 1978; 2004, ch. 189, § 29, effective July 13, 2004; 2019 ch. 184, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

436.610.
Confiscation of animals on premises where violations of KRS 525.125 and 525.130 occur.

All animals of the same species, which are on the property when an animal is caused to fight for pleasure or profit, in violation of the provisions of KRS

525.125

and

525.130

, shall be confiscated and turned over to the county animal control officer employed, appointed, or contracted with as provided by KRS

258.195

, if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the animals were on the property for the purpose of fighting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 67, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2004, ch. 189, § 30, effective July 13, 2004.